Maryland, session 2025, SB0535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
Title 15. Research Facilities [that] AND TESTING FACILITIES THAT Use [Dogs or Cats]
ANIMALS.
15–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “RESEARCH FACILITY” MEANS ANY FACILITY IN THE STATE THAT
USES LIVE ANIMALS FOR RESEARCH, EDUCATION, OR EXPERIMENTATION.
(2) “RESEARCH FACILITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A PARTNERSHIP, A CORPORATION, AN ASSOCIATION, AN
INSTITUTION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY IN THE STATE THAT
PROVIDES ONLY BENEFICIAL SERVICES TO AN ANIMAL, SUCH AS SPAYING AND
NEUTERING; OR
(II) A SCHOOL OR AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(C) “STATE INSPECTOR” MEANS THE STATE INSPECTOR OF ANIMAL
WELFARE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 15–104 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 535 3
(D) (1) “TESTING FACILITY” MEANS A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE
PARTNERSHIP, CORPORATION, ASSOCIATION, ORGANIZATION, OR OTHER ENTITY IN
THE STATE THAT USES ANIMALS FOR THE TESTING OF:
(I) CHEMICAL SUBSTANCES;
(II) INGREDIENTS;
(III) DRUGS;
(IV) VACCINES;
(V) PRODUCTS; OR
(VI) PRODUCT FORMULATIONS.
(2) “TESTING FACILITY” INCLUDES A PARTNERSHIP, A
CORPORATION, AN ASSOCIATION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY IN THE
STATE THAT IS OWNED, LEASED, OR OPERATED BY A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ENTITY.
(3) “TESTING FACILITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A PARTNERSHIP, A CORPORATION, AN ASSOCIATION, AN
INSTITUTION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY IN THE STATE THAT
PROVIDES ONLY BENEFICIAL SERVICES TO AN ANIMAL, SUCH AS SPAYING AND
NEUTERING; OR
(II) A SCHOOL OR AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
15–102.
(A) EACH RESEARCH FACILITY AND TESTING FACILITY MUST BE LICENSED
BY THE DEPARTMENT TO USE ANIMALS IN RESEARCH, EDUCATION, OR TESTING.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A LICENSE TO A RESEARCH FACILITY
OR TESTING FACILITY THAT:
(1) PASSES AN INSPECTION CONDUCTED BY THE STATE INSPECTOR
UNDER § 15–104 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(2) AGREES TO COMPLY WITH THE INSPECTION AND REPORTING
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 535
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CHARGE A LICENSING FEE TO:
(1) A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY THAT USES ANIMALS
NOT COVERED UNDER THE FEDERAL ANIMAL WELFARE ACT; AND
(2) COVER THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING THIS TITLE.
[15–101.] 15–103.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Animal rescue organization” includes:
(i) A nonprofit organization incorporated for the purpose of rescuing
animals in need and finding permanent adoptive homes for the animals; and
(ii) A government–operated animal control unit that provides
animals for adoption.
(3) [“Research facility” includes:
(i) A higher education research facility;
(ii) A scientific research facility;
(iii) A medical research facility; and
(iv) A product testing facility.
(4)] “Scientific research purposes” includes:
(i) Investigation;
(ii) Experimentation;
(iii) Instruction; and
(iv) Testing.
(b) This section applies to a dog or cat that, in the determination of an attending
veterinarian, is suitable for adoption.
(c) A research facility OR TESTING FACILITY located in the State in which dogs
or cats are used for scientific research purposes shall take reasonable steps to provide for
the adoption of a dog or cat that, in the determination of the research facility OR TESTING
FACILITY, is no longer needed for scientific research purposes by:

SENATE BILL 535 5
(1) Establishing a private placement process to provide for the adoption of
a dog or cat;
(2) Establishing a list of animal rescue organizations that are approved by
the research facility OR TESTING FACILITY and are willing to take a dog or cat from the
research facility OR TESTING FACILITY; and
(3) Offering the dog or cat to the animal rescue organizations identified in
the list established under item (2) of this subsection if the research facility OR TESTING
FACILITY is unable to place the dog or cat through its private placement process.
(d) A research facility OR TESTING FACILITY may enter into a collaborative
agreement with an animal rescue organization for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of this section.
15–104.
(A) THERE IS A STATE INSPECTOR OF ANIMAL WELFARE IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) (1) THE STATE INSPECTOR SHALL:
(I) INSPECT EACH RESEARCH FACILITY AND TESTING FACILITY
APPLYING FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS TITLE;
(II) INSPECT AT LEAST ONCE EVERY YEAR EACH RESEARCH
FACILITY AND TESTING FACILITY THAT:
1. HAS AN ACTIVE LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS TITLE;
BUT
2. IS NOT REGISTERED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE UNDER THE FEDERAL ANIMAL WELFARE ACT; AND
(III) INSPECT AT LEAST ONCE EVERY OTHER YEAR EACH
RESEARCH FACILITY AND TESTING FACILITY:
1. FOR WHICH A LICENSE HAS BEEN ISSUED UNDER THIS
TITLE; AND
2. REGISTERED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE UNDER THE FEDERAL ANIMAL WELFARE ACT.

SENATE BILL 535
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH AN
ANIMAL WELFARE ORGANIZATION, A LOCAL ANIMAL CONTROL AGENCY, OR
ANOTHER SIMILAR ENTITY TO CONDUCT THE INSPECTIONS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY SHALL NOTIFY THE
STATE INSPECTOR WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF ANY VIOLATION
NOTIFICATION THE RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY RECEIVES FOR A
VIOLATION OF THE FEDERAL ANIMAL WELFARE ACT OR THE REGULATIONS
ADOPTED UNDER THE ACT.
(2) THE STATE INSPECTOR SHALL INSPECT A RESEARCH FACILITY
OR TESTING FACILITY WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING NOTIFICATION FROM THE
RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY THAT IT IS IN VIOLATION OF THE
FEDERAL ANIMAL WELFARE ACT OR THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THE ACT.
15–105.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, A SCHOOL OR AN
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT USES ANIMALS FOR THE SAME PURPOSE
AS A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
ON THE RESULTS OF ANY INSPECTION OF THE SCHOOL OR THE INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION PERFORMED BY THE AGENCY THAT REGULATES THE USE OF
ANIMALS BY THE SCHOOL OR THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(B) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE ANY VIOLATIONS FOUND DURING AN INSPECTION.
15–106.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE ANIMALS IN RESEARCH FUND.
(B) THERE IS AN ANIMALS IN RESEARCH FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO COVER THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY DUTIES OF THE STATE INSPECTOR.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 535 7
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) LICENSING FEES CHARGED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER §
15–102 OF THIS TITLE;
(2) PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER § 15–107 OF THIS TITLE;
(3) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(4) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(5) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO COVER THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY DUTIES OF THE STATE INSPECTOR.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY DUTIES OF THE STATE INSPECTOR IS
SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT
OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR THESE COSTS.
15–107.
A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY THAT VIOLATES THIS TITLE IS
SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000; AND
(2) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $5,000.

SENATE BILL 535
15–108.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(1) CARRY OUT THIS TITLE; AND
(2) ENSURE THE HUMANE TREATMENT AND CARE OF DOGS AND CATS
THAT ARE USED FOR RESEARCH, EDUCATION, OR TESTING CONSISTENT WITH THE
FEDERAL ANIMAL WELFARE ACT AND CORRESPONDING REGULATIONS.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE ANIMALS IN RESEARCH FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.